North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 2. Powers and Duties of Department and Board of Transportation.
§ 136-19.6.
Right-of-Way Claim Report.

Intent. — It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide the Department of Transportation with the resources and flexibility necessary to accelerate the time in which projects are completed while maintaining fairness to affected property owners and other citizens of this State. It is the belief of the General Assembly that providing the Department with the flexibility allowed under subsection (b) of this section will help toward achieving this intent. Therefore, the Department is encouraged to utilize the flexibility provided in subsection (b) of this section for all acquisitions of land in which the estimate of the acquisition is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less.

Permissive Exception to Appraisal. — When the Department acquires land, and except as otherwise required by federal law, an appraisal is not required if the Department estimates that the proposed acquisition is forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or less, based on a review of data available to the Department at the time the Department begins the acquisition process. If the Department estimates the acquisition to be forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or less, the Department may prepare a Right-of-Way Claim Report instead of an appraisal. The owner of the land to be acquired may request the Department provide an appraisal for any right-of-way claim of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more. The Department may contract with a qualified third party to prepare a Right-of-Way Claim Report. Any person preparing a Right-of-Way Claim Report must have a sufficient understanding of the local real estate market.

Construction. — Nothing in subsection (b) of this section shall be construed as superseding or altering any provision of federal law requiring the Department to obtain an appraisal of a property the Department is attempting to acquire.

History.

2017-57, s. 34.5(a); 2018-74, s. 1(a).

§ 136-19.7.
Residue property disposal; Department authority; definitions; classification and valuation; disposition method; proceeds; approvals required.

State Policy. — It is the policy of the State that the Department of Transportation shall dispose of its residue real property as expeditiously as possible for the benefit of the citizens and taxpayers of the State.

Department Authority to Dispose of Residue Property. — The Department, in accordance with this section, is vested with the power to manage, control, and dispose of real property acquired in fee simple and that the Department determines to be residue property.

Definitions. — When used in this section, the following definitions apply:

Appraised value. — The value of residue property determined by an appropriate area appraiser or appraiser using Department appraisal methodology.

Appraiser. — An appraiser licensed or certified by the North Carolina Appraisal Board and approved by the Department to accomplish Department appraisals.

Area appraiser. — A Department supervising staff appraiser currently associated with a Department area appraisal office.

Current market value. — The value of property determined by the Department, in the absence of an appraised value, when obtaining an appraisal is not feasible as determined by the Department. This value shall be determined by the appropriate Division Right-of-Way agent and Right-of-Way Unit manager. The Department shall document a determination of current market value by means other than determining an appraised value.

Negotiated sale. — Method of sale involving discussion and agreement of sale terms with a single or limited group of purchasers. This method may be undertaken by the Department or the Department may delegate a negotiated sale of residue property to real estate brokers licensed in this State, at the election of the Chief Engineer.

Public sale. — Method of disposing of residue property utilizing advertising and solicitation of competitive bids. This method may be undertaken by the Department or the Department may delegate a public sale to a real estate broker, auctioneer, or auction firm licensed in this State, at the election of the Chief Engineer.

Residue property. — Real property that is owned in fee simple by the Department that was acquired by the Department in addition to the property necessary for a transportation project because it would have been an uneconomic remnant to the prior owner following completion of that transportation project.

Residue property value. — The Department approved value of the residue property established by either the current market value or appraised value method.

Uneconomic remnant. — Real property, that was located outside of a proposed right-of-way prior to acquisition, determined to have nominal or no value to the owner after a Department acquisition pursuant to

G.S. 136-19

.

Upset bid. — At a public sale, an increased bid by a person that exceeds the highest bid received in response to the notice of public sale, or the last upset bid, as applicable, by a minimum of five percent (5%).

Classification of Residue Property. — The Department shall adopt criteria to guide the Department in classifying residue property, in its opinion, according to its highest potential benefit to the Department or potential purchasers. Once classified, residue property that has not been disposed of within five years shall be reviewed and reclassified if appropriate. [Classification is as follows:]

Residue property of sufficient size and access to allow commercial or residential development shall be designated “Class A.”

Residue property that enhances the value of adjacent property by allowing more extensive use when joined with adjacent property shall be designated “Class B.”

Residue property that, due to size or access, is only of value to adjacent property owners, or that is of minimal or no value, shall be designated “Class C.”

Residue property that has not yet been classified or may be needed by the Department for future use shall be designated “Class D.”

Residue Property Inventory. — The Department shall create and maintain a single comprehensive and up-to-date inventory of residue property owned in fee simple by the Department.

Methods of Disposition Based on Class of Residue Property. — The Department shall utilize its best efforts to dispose of Class A, Class B, and Class C residue property within four years of its classification and in accordance with the following methods:

Public sale. — The sale of Class A residue property shall be disposed of by public sale and may be sold by either sealed bid or by auction at the election of the Right-of-Way Branch of the Department. The sale of the property must be advertised by at least two of the following methods:

Publication once a week for at least two successive weeks in a newspaper qualified for legal advertising published in the area in which the residue property is located or, if no newspaper qualified for legal advertising is published in the area, in a newspaper having general circulation in the area in which the residue property is located.

Placement on the Department Web site.

Placement of a “For Sale” sign on the residue property.

Upset bids must be received within 10 business days following the deadline for receipt of sealed bids or closing of an auction. The highest bid shall be presented to the Board of Transportation at its next regular meeting after the deadline for receipt of bids for rejection or acceptance. The Department may reject all bids if the Department does not consider the bids to be in accord with the appraised value as approved by the Department. The Department shall approve an appraised value for Class A residue property prior to disposition pursuant to this subdivision.

Other methods of disposition for residue property. —

Class A, Class B, or Class C residue property may be conveyed to a State agency, public institution, and other local governmental units by negotiated sale or exchange or may be donated provided its future use is for public purposes.

Class B residue property may be sold, in whole or in part, where feasible, by either negotiated sale or exchange for a residue property value that is approved by the Division Right-of-Way agent and the Right-of-Way Unit manager.

Class C residue property may be sold to an adjacent property owner, in whole or in part, where feasible, by either negotiated sale or exchange for the residue property value that is approved by the Division Right-of-Way agent and the Right-of-Way Unit manager.

Class B and Class C residue property with an area of one acre or less and a residue property value of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less may be sold by negotiated sale or exchange with an adjoining owner. The Division Right-of-Way agent or their designee may negotiate with the adjoining owners concerning the disposal of each residue for a consideration that is approved by the Division Right-of-Way agent and the Right-of-Way Unit manager.

Exchange with a public utility company. — Class B and Class C residue property may be used for the purpose of exchange with a public utility company in part or in full consideration for acquiring rights-of-way. The exchange shall be based on the residue property value and the fair market value of rights-of-way to be acquired.

Exchange with a property owner. — Class B and Class C residue property may be used for the purpose of exchange with another property owner in part or full consideration for acquiring rights-of-way. The exchange shall be based on the residue property value and the fair market value of rights-of-way to be acquired.

Sale to persons displaced by a transportation project. — Residue property may be sold by negotiated sale to a property owner displaced by a transportation project and shall be based upon the residue property value. Residue property sold pursuant to this subdivision shall not include any real property previously owned by a displaced property owner.

Proceeds to State Highway Fund. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 146-15

and

G.S. 146-30

, no service charge into the State Land Fund shall be deducted from or levied against the proceeds of any disposition of residue property pursuant to this section. Net proceeds received pursuant to disposition of residue property in accordance with this section, less any apportionment required by federal law or regulation regulating its use, shall be deposited in the State Highway Fund.

Approvals Required. — All conveyances of residue property require Department and Board of Transportation approval. Conveyance of residue property with a residue property value of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall not require the approval of the Governor and Council of State; otherwise Governor and Council of State approval is also required.

Recordation of Conveyance. — The Department shall record all conveyances of residue property pursuant to this section in accordance with

G.S. 47-27

and other applicable State law.

Rule-Making Authority. — The Department shall also have the authority to adopt, amend, or repeal rules as it may deem necessary to carry out its duties under the provisions of this section.

Reconveyance to Former Owner. — Nothing in this section shall preclude the reconveyance of condemned property to its former owner pursuant to

G.S. 136-19

.

Report to Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee. — No later than March 1, 2019, and by March 1 each year thereafter, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on the classification and sale of residue properties pursuant to this section. At a minimum, this report shall include information on the following:

The number and type of properties classified.

The number and type of properties sold, including information about the manner of sale, the identity of the purchaser, and the average ratio of sale price to residue property value of the properties sold.

History.

2017-137, s. 2(a); 2017-212, s. 1.3.

§ 136-20.
Elimination or safeguarding of grade crossings and inadequate underpasses or overpasses.

Whenever any road or street forming a link in or a part of the State highway system, whether under construction or heretofore or hereafter constructed, shall cross or intersect any railroad at the same level or grade, or by an underpass or overpass, and in the opinion of the Secretary of Transportation such crossing is dangerous to the traveling public, or unreasonably interferes with or impedes traffic on said State highway, the Department of Transportation shall issue notice requiring the person or company operating such railroad to appear before the Secretary of Transportation, at his office in Raleigh, upon a day named, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 20 days from the date of said notice, and show cause, if any it has, why such railroad company shall not be required to alter such crossing in such way as to remove such dangerous condition and to make such changes and improvements thereat as will safeguard and secure the safety and convenience of the traveling public thereafter. Such notice shall be served on such railroad company as is now provided by law for the service of summons on domestic corporations, and officers serving such notice shall receive the same fees as now provided by law for the service of such summons.

Upon the day named, the Secretary of Transportation shall hear said matter and shall determine whether such crossing is dangerous to public safety, or unreasonably interferes with traffic thereon. If he shall determine that said crossing is, or upon the completion of such highway will be, dangerous to public safety and its elimination or safeguarding is necessary for the proper protection of the traffic on said State highway, the Secretary of Transportation shall thereupon order the construction of an adequate underpass or overpass at said crossing or he may in his discretion order said railroad company to install and maintain gates, alarm signals or other approved safety devices if and when in the opinion of said Secretary of Transportation upon the hearing as aforesaid the public safety and convenience will be secured thereby. And said order shall specify that the cost of construction of such underpass or overpass or the installation of such safety device shall be allocated between the railroad company and the Department of Transportation in the same ratio as the net benefits received by such railroad company from the project bear to the net benefits accruing to the public using the highway, and in no case shall the net benefit to any railroad company or companies be deemed to be more than ten percent (10%) of the total benefits resulting from the project. The Secretary of Transportation shall be responsible for determining the proportion of the benefits derived by the railroad company from the project, and shall fix standards for the determining of said benefits which shall be consistent with the standards adopted for similar purposes by the United States Bureau of Public Roads under the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1944.

Upon the filing and issuance of the order as hereinbefore provided for requiring the construction of any underpass or overpass or the installation and maintenance of gates, alarm signals or other safety devices at any crossing upon the State highway system, it shall be the duty of the railroad company operating the railroad with which said public road or street intersects or crosses to construct such underpass or overpass or to install and maintain such safety device as may be required in said order. The work may be done and material furnished either by the railroad company or the Department of Transportation, as may be agreed upon, and the cost thereof shall be allocated and borne as set out in subsection (b) hereof. If the work is done and material furnished by the railroad company, an itemized statement of the total amount expended therefor shall, at the completion of the work, be furnished the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Transportation shall pay such amount to the railroad company as may be shown on such statement after deducting the amount for which the railroad company is responsible; and if the work is done by the Department of Transportation, an itemized statement of the total amount expended shall be furnished to the railroad company, and the railroad company shall pay to the Department of Transportation such part thereof as the railroad company may be responsible for as herein provided; such payment by the railroad company shall be under such rules and regulations and by such methods as the Department of Transportation may provide.

Within 60 days after the issuance of the order for construction of an underpass or overpass or the installation of other safety devices as herein provided for, the railroad company against which such order is issued shall submit to the Department of Transportation plans for such construction or installation, and within 10 days thereafter said Department of Transportation, through its chairman of the Department of Transportation, shall notify such railroad company of its approval of said plan or of such changes and amendments thereto as to it shall seem advisable. If such plans are not submitted to the Department of Transportation by said railroad company within 60 days as aforesaid, the chairman of the Department of Transportation shall have plans prepared and submit them to the railroad company. The railroad company shall within 10 days notify the chairman of the Department of Transportation of its approval of the said plans or shall have the right within such 10 days to suggest such changes and amendments in the plans so submitted by the chairman of the Department of Transportation as to it shall seem advisable. The plans so prepared and finally approved by the chairman of the Department of Transportation shall have the same force and effect, and said railroad company shall be charged with like liability, and said underpass or overpass shall be constructed or such safety device installed in accordance therewith, as if said plans had been originally prepared and submitted by said railroad company. If said railroad company shall fail or neglect to begin or complete the construction of said underpass or overpass, or the installation of such safety device, as required by the order of the Secretary of Transportation, said Secretary of Transportation is authorized and directed to prepare the necessary plans therefor, which plans shall have the same force and effect, and shall fix said railroad company with like liability, as if said plans had been originally prepared and submitted by said railroad company, and the Department of Transportation shall proceed to construct said underpass or overpass or install such safety device in accordance therewith. An accurate account of the cost of said construction or installation shall be kept by the Department of Transportation and upon the completion of such work a statement of that portion thereof chargeable to such railroad company as set out in the order of the Department of Transportation shall be rendered said railroad company. Upon the failure or refusal of said company to pay the bill so rendered, the Department of Transportation shall recover the amount thereof by suit therefor against said company in the Superior Court of Wake County: Provided, that the payment by such railroad company of said proportionate part may be made under such rules and regulations and by such methods as the Department of Transportation may provide. If the Department of Transportation shall undertake to do the work, it shall not obstruct or impair the operation of the railroad and shall keep the roadbed and track safe for the operation of trains at every stage of work. If said railroad company shall construct such underpass or overpass or shall install such safety devices in accordance with the order of the Secretary of Transportation, the proportionate share of the cost thereof as set out in subsection (b) hereof shall upon the completion of said work be paid to the railroad company by the Department of Transportation. The Department of Transportation may inspect and check the expenditures for such construction or installation so made by the railroad company and an accurate account of the cost thereof shall upon the completion of said work be submitted to the Department of Transportation by the railroad company. If the Department of Transportation shall neglect or refuse to pay that portion of the cost of said construction or installation chargeable to it, the railroad company shall recover the amount thereof by suit therefor against the Department of Transportation in the Superior Court of Wake County.

If any railroad company so ordered by the Secretary of Transportation to construct an underpass or overpass or to install safety devices at grade crossings as hereinbefore provided for shall fail or refuse to comply with the order of the Secretary of Transportation requiring such construction or installation, said railroad company shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and shall only be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) in the discretion of the court for each day such failure or refusal shall continue, each said day to constitute a separate offense.

The jurisdiction over and control of said grade crossings and safety devices upon the State highway system herein given the Department of Transportation shall be exclusive.

From any order or decision so made by the Secretary of Transportation the railroad company may appeal to the superior court of the county wherein is located the crossing affected by said order. Such appeal shall not defer or delay the construction of such underpass or overpass or the installation of such safety device as required by the order of the Secretary of Transportation, but the railroad company shall proceed to comply with such order in accordance with his terms. The action of the railroad company in complying with and carrying out such order pending said appeal shall not prejudice or affect the right or remedies of such railroad company on such appeal. Upon such appeal the court shall determine only whether the order of the Secretary of Transportation for such construction or installation is unreasonable and unnecessary for the protection of the traveling public and the apportionment of the cost to the extent hereinafter provided in this subsection, and if upon the hearing of said appeal it shall be determined that said order was unnecessary for the protection of the traveling public, the Department of Transportation shall bear the total cost of the construction of such underpass or overpass or the installation of such safety device. In the event the decision on appeal should be that the construction or installation was necessary but the cost or apportionment thereof unreasonable, then the railroad company shall bear its proportion as provided in this section of such cost as may be determined on appeal to have been reasonable to meet the necessity of the case. Upon said appeal from an order of the Secretary of Transportation, the burden of proof shall be upon the railroad company, and if it shall not be found and determined upon said appeal that said order was unreasonable or unnecessary for the protection of the traveling public at said crossing, then such railroad company shall bear its proportion of the cost of such construction or installation in accordance with this section.

The Department of Transportation shall pay the cost of maintenance of all overpasses and the railroad company shall pay the cost of maintenance of all underpasses constructed in accordance with this section. The cost of maintenance of safety devices at all intersections of any railroad company and any street or road forming a link in or a part of the State highway system which have been constructed prior to July 1, 1959, or which shall be constructed thereafter shall be borne fifty percent (50%) by the railroad company and fifty percent (50%) by the Department of Transportation. The maintenance of said overpasses and underpasses shall be performed by the railroad company or the Department of Transportation as may be agreed upon and reimbursement for the cost thereof, in accordance with this section, shall be made annually. The maintenance of such safety devices shall be performed by the railroad company and reimbursement for the cost thereof, in accordance with this section, shall be made annually by the Department of Transportation.

History.

1921, c. 2, s. 19; 1923, c. 160, s. 5; C.S., s. 3846(y); 1925, c. 277; 1929, c. 74; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1959, c. 1216; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 11, 15; 1993, c. 539, s. 979; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 60; c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For note on railroads’ liability at dangerous highway crossings, see 41 N.C.L. Rev. 296 (1963).

§ 136-20.1.
To require installation and maintenance of block system and safety devices; automatic signals at railroad intersections.

The Department of Transportation is empowered and directed to require any railroad company to install and put in operation and maintain upon the whole or any part of its road a block system of telegraphy or any other reasonable safety device, but no railroad company shall be required to install a block system upon any part of its road unless at least eight trains each way per day are operated on that part.

The Department of Transportation is empowered and directed to require, when public safety demands, where two or more railroads cross each other at a common grade, or any railroad crosses any stream or harbor by means of a bridge, to install and maintain such a system of interlocking or automatic signals as will render it safe for engines and trains to pass over such crossings or bridge without stopping, and to apportion the cost of installation and maintenance between said railroads as may be just and proper.

History.

1907, c. 469, s. 1b; 1911, c. 197, s. 2; Ex. Sess. 1913, c. 63, s. 1; C.S., ss. 1047, 1049; 1933, c. 134, s. 8; 1941, c. 97; 1963, c. 1165, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 673, s. 5.

§ 136-21.
Drainage of highway; application to court; summons; commissioners.

Whenever in the establishment, construction, improvement or maintenance of any public highway it shall be necessary to drain said highway, and to accomplish such purpose it becomes necessary to excavate a canal or canals for carrying the surplus water to some appropriate outlet, either along the right-of-way of said highway or across the lands of other landowners, and by the construction, enlargement or improvement of such canal or canals, lands other than said highway will be drained and benefited, then, and in such event, the Department of Transportation, if said highway be a part of the State highway system, or the county commissioners, if said road is not under State supervision, may, by petition, apply to the superior court of the county in which, in whole or in part, said highway lies or said canal is to be constructed, setting forth the necessity for the construction, improvement or maintenance of said canal, the lands which will be drained thereby, with such particularity as to enable same to be identified, the names of the owners of said land and the particular circumstances of the case; whereupon a summons shall be issued for and served upon each of the proprietors, requiring them to appear before the court at a time to be named in the summons, which shall not be less than 10 days from the service thereof, and upon such day the petition shall be heard, and the court shall appoint three disinterested persons, one of whom shall be a competent civil and drainage engineer recommended by the Department of Environmental Quality, and the other two of whom shall be resident freeholders of the county or counties in which the road and lands are, in whole or in part, located, as commissioners, who shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, be sworn to do justice between the parties.

History.

1925, c. 85, s. 3; c. 122, s. 44; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(88); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 136-22.
View by commissioners; report; judgment.

The commissioners, or a majority of them, one of whom must be the engineer aforesaid, shall, on a day of which each party is to be notified at least five days in advance, meet on the premises, and view the highway, or proposed highway, and also the lands which may be drained by the proposed canal, and shall determine and report what lands will be drained and benefited by the construction, enlargement or improvement of such canal, and whether said drainage ought to be done exclusively by said highway authorities, and if they are of opinion that the same ought not to be drained exclusively at their expense, then they shall decide and determine the route of the canal, the dimensions and character thereof, and the manner in which the same shall be cut or thrown up, considering all the circumstances of the case, the extent, area and identity of lands which shall be permitted to drain therein, and providing as far as possible for the effectual drainage of said highway, and the protection and benefit of the lands of all the parties; and they shall apportion the cost of the construction, repair and maintenance of said canal among said highway authorities and said landowners, and report the same to the court, which when confirmed by the clerk shall stand as a judgment of the court against each of the parties, his or its executors, administrators, heirs, assigns or successors.

History.

1925, c. 85, s. 4.

§ 136-23.
Appeal.

Upon the entry of the judgment or decree aforesaid the parties to said action, or any of them, shall have the right to appeal to the superior court in term time under the same rules and regulations as apply to other special proceedings.

History.

1925, c. 85, s. 5.

§ 136-24.
Rights of parties.

The parties to such special proceeding shall have all the rights which are secured to similar parties by Article 1 of Chapter 146 of this Code and shall be regulated by the provisions thereof and amendments thereto, insofar as the same are not inconsistent herewith.

History.

1925, c. 85, s. 6.

§ 136-25.
Repair of road detour.

It shall be mandatory upon the Department of Transportation, its officers and employees, or any contractor or subcontractor employed by the said Department of Transportation, to select, lay out, maintain and keep in as good repair as possible suitable detours by the most practical route while said highways or roads are being improved or constructed, and it shall be mandatory upon the said Department of Transportation and its employees or contractors to place or cause to be placed explicit directions to the traveling public during repair of said highway or road under the process of construction. All expense of laying out and maintaining said detours shall be paid out of the State Highway Fund.

History.

1921, c. 2, s. 11; C.S., s. 3846(s); 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-26.
Closing of State transportation infrastructure during construction or for dangerous conditions; driving through, removal, injury to barriers, warning signs, etc.

If it shall appear necessary to the Department of Transportation, its officers, or appropriate employees, to close any transportation infrastructure coming under its jurisdiction so as to permit proper completion of construction work which is being performed, or to prohibit traffic on transportation infrastructure due to damage posing a danger to public safety, the Department of Transportation, its officers or employees, may close, or cause to be closed, the whole or any portion of transportation infrastructure deemed necessary to be excluded from public travel. While any transportation infrastructure, or portion thereof, is so closed, or while any transportation infrastructure, or portion thereof, is in process of construction or maintenance, the Department of Transportation, its officers or appropriate employees, or its contractor, under authority from the Department of Transportation, may erect, or cause to be erected, suitable barriers or obstruction thereon; may post, or cause to be posted, conspicuous notices to the effect that the transportation infrastructure, or portion thereof, is closed; and may place warning signs, lights and lanterns on transportation infrastructure, or portions thereof.

When infrastructure is closed to the public as provided herein, any person who willfully drives onto transportation infrastructure closed pursuant to this section or removes, injures or destroys any such barrier or barriers or obstructions on the road closed or being constructed, or tears down, removes or destroys any such notices, or extinguishes, removes, injures or destroys any such warning signs, lights, or lanterns so erected, posted, or placed pursuant to this section, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

This prohibition [in this section] does not apply to law enforcement, first responders, personnel of emergency management agencies, or Department of Transportation personnel acting in the course of, and within the scope of, their official duties; or personnel acting in the course of, and within the scope of, installation, restoration or maintenance of utility services in coordination with the Department of Transportation.

History.

1921, c. 2, s. 12; C.S., s. 3846(t); 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1993, c. 539, s. 980; 2009-266, s. 10; 2019-84, s. 1.

§ 136-27.
Connection of highways with improved streets; pipelines and conduits; cost.

When any portion of the State highway system shall run through any city or town and it shall be found necessary to connect the State highway system with improved streets of such city or town as may be designated as part of such system, the Department of Transportation shall build such connecting links, the same to be uniform in dimensions and materials with such State highways: Provided, however, that whenever any city or town may desire to widen its streets which may be traversed by the State highway, the Department of Transportation may make such arrangements with said city or town in connection with the construction of said road as, in its discretion, may seem wise and just under all the facts and circumstances in connection therewith: Provided further, that such city or town shall save the Department of Transportation harmless from any claims for damage arising from the construction of said road through such city or town and including claims for rights-of-way, change of grade line, and interference with public-service structures. And the Department of Transportation may require such city or town to cause to be laid all water, sewer, gas or other pipelines or conduits, together with all necessary house or lot connections or services, to the curb line of such road or street to be constructed: Provided further, that whenever by agreement with the road governing body of any city or town any street designated as a part of the State highway system shall be surfaced by order of the Department of Transportation at the expense, in whole or in part, of a city or town it shall be lawful for the governing body of such city or town to declare an assessment district as to the street to be improved, without petition by the owners of property abutting thereon, and the costs thereof, exclusive of so much of the cost as is incurred at street intersections and the share of railroads or street railways whose tracks are laid in said street, which shall be assessed under their franchise, shall be specially assessed upon the lots or parcels of land abutting directly on the improvements, according to the extent of their respective frontage thereon by an equal rate per foot of such frontage.

History.

1921, c. 2, s. 16; 1923, c. 160, s. 4; C.S., s. 3846(ff); 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

Local Modification.

Durham: 1925, c. 312; town of Siler City: 1935 Pr., c. 143.

§ 136-27.1.
Relocation of water and sewer lines of municipalities, nonprofit water or sewer corporations or associations, local boards of education, and certain private water or sewer utilities.

The Department of Transportation shall pay the nonbetterment cost for the relocation of water and sewer lines, located within the existing State transportation project right-of-way, that are necessary to be relocated for a State transportation improvement project and that are owned by: (i) a municipality with a population of 10,000 or less according to the latest decennial census; (ii) a nonprofit water or sewer association or corporation; (iii) any water or sewer system organized pursuant to Chapter 162A of the General Statutes; (iv) a rural water system operated by a County as an enterprise system; (v) any sanitary district organized pursuant to Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes; (vi) constructed by a water or sewer system organized pursuant to Chapter 162A of the General Statutes and then sold or transferred to a municipality with a population of greater than 10,000 according to the latest decennial census; (vii) a local board of education; or (viii) a private water or sewer utility organized pursuant to Chapter 62 of the General Statutes serving 10,000 or fewer customers.

A municipality with a population of greater than 10,000 shall pay a percentage of the nonbetterment cost for relocation of water and sewer lines owned by the municipality and located within the existing State transportation project right-of-way that are necessary to be relocated for a State transportation improvement project. The percentage shall be based on the municipality’s population, with the Department paying the remaining costs, as follows:

A municipality with a population of greater than 10,000, but less than 50,000, shall pay twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost.

A municipality with a population of 50,000 or greater, but less than 100,000, shall pay fifty percent (50%) of the cost.

A municipality with a population of 100,000 or greater shall pay one hundred percent (100%) of the cost.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1090; 1985, c. 479, s. 186(a); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1018, s. 11; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 736, s. 1; 1995, c. 33, s. 1; c. 266, s. 1.1; 2009-266, s. 11; 2015-111, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 29.20(a); 2019-197, s. 1; 2020-74, s. 16(a).

§ 136-27.2.
Relocation of county-owned natural gas lines located on Department of Transportation right-of-way.

The Department of Transportation shall pay the nonbetterment cost for the relocation of county-owned natural gas lines, located within the existing State transportation project right-of-way, that the Department needs to relocate due to a State transportation improvement project.

History.

2002-126, s. 26.18(a); 2009-266, s. 12.

§ 136-27.3.
Relocation of municipalities’ utilities by Department; repayment by municipalities.

When requiring municipalities to relocate utilities under its power granted in G.S. 136-18(10), the Department may enter into agreements with municipalities to provide that the necessary engineering and utility construction be accomplished by the Department on a reimbursement basis as follows:

Reimbursement to the Department shall be due after completion of the work and within 60 days after date of invoice.

Interest shall be paid on any unpaid balance due at a variable rate of the prime rate plus one percent (1%).

History.

2012-142, s. 24.22; 2012-145, s. 6.1.